Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1723
Parking authority; termination; improvements; funds.

The authority shall not be terminated by any act of the state prior to the payment in full of all obligations incurred by the authority. Unless terminated prior thereto, the authority shall terminate at the end of fifty years from the date of its establishment and it shall forthwith liquidate its affairs and convey to the city and county respectively any improvements on the property contributed by them. Any surplus funds shall be distributed to the county and city in the manner provided by section 14-1720 and thereupon the authority shall cease to exist.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 23, p. 113.